Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 48. Architects, Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Landscape Architects.

Administrative Code. —

For state board of registration for architects, engineers, and land surveyors, see 12 AAC 36.

Collateral references. —

Steven G.M. Stein, The American Institute of Architects Legal Citator (Matthew Bender).

5 Am. Jur. 2d, Architects, §§ 1-5

58 Am. Jur. 2d, Occupations, Trades and Professions, §§ 69-75.

6 C.J.S., Architects, §§ 7-15.

Practice of architecture by corporation as affected by license regulation, 56 ALR2d 726.

Right of architect or engineer licensed in one state to recover compensation for services rendered in another state, or in connection with construction in another state, where he was not licensed in the latter state, 32 ALR3d 1151.